Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 6

Archeological Research

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

[Reserved]

Subchapter 2

— Archeological Survey

Preambles.

Acts 1959, No. 82 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, Arkansas is a state rich in archeological resources which, if properly excavated, catalogued and preserved, can add immeasurably to the knowledge of our history and our heritage; and

“Whereas, the preservation of our antiquities is of value and interest not only to the citizens of Arkansas but to persons from other states who visit Arkansas as well; and

“Whereas, many historic sites and archeological treasures are either unsurveyed and undiscovered, due to lack of a coordinated and adequate program, or are, in fact, in danger of being lost to posterity by reason of unscientific exploitation, highway construction, flooding from reservoirs in connection with building of dams, and by other means:

“Now therefore, this legislative body recognizes the need for a statewide program of archeological research and enacts this measure for the achievement of that purpose.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 10: Feb. 20, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that archeological materials, sites, mounds, and relics are being lost through thoughtless destruction by untrained excavators as well as through the construction of public dams and highways; that early preventive action is required and that immediate educational efforts should be made in order that the heritage of an earlier age not be lost; that a comprehensive state program of archeology will result in findings which will be of interest and value not only to the citizens of this state but to those who visit Arkansas as well; that the best method of accomplishing these objectives and preventing the losses referred to is by creation of a state program of archeological research. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and welfare shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 12: Feb. 6, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that archeological materials, sites, mounds and relics are being lost through thoughtless destruction by untrained excavators as well as through the construction of public dams and highways; that it is essential to the discovery and preservation of these priceless relics, artifacts and other archeological materials of prior cultures in Arkansas that the existing program of archeological research and discovery be enlarged, broadened and expanded by the establishment of the Arkansas Archeological Survey and by the appointment of a skilled and qualified State Archeologist; that in order to accomplish these purposes, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary to the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1638, § 19: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

13-6-201. Arkansas Archeological Survey established.

The President of the University of Arkansas system is designated agent of the State of Arkansas for the purpose of conducting a program of archeological research as described in this subchapter which shall be referred to as the “Arkansas Archeological Survey”.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 1; 1967, No. 39, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-1001, 9-1009.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 1, provided for the continuation and expansion of the program of archeological research and discovery established pursuant to Acts 1959, No. 82. The section further provided that its intent was to authorize and encourage all public institutions of higher learning in Arkansas to participate in the program. Section 10 of that act provided that the provisions of the act were supplemental to Acts 1959, No. 82 and did not repeal or modify any provisions of the latter act except as specifically provided in the 1967 act.

Acts 1977, No. 741, § 1, provided for the transfer of the supervision and direction of the Arkansas Archeological Survey from the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas to the President of the University of Arkansas System.

13-6-202. Survey's functions.

The Arkansas Archeological Survey shall initiate, operate, and maintain a program in archeology which shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas of action:

(1)

Excavation of archeological and historical sites, ruins, and mounds for the purpose of securing data and objects relating to early humans in Arkansas;

(2)

Fundamental research in Arkansas archeology and encouragement of public cooperation in the preservation of Arkansas antiquities;

(3)

Research in and study of anthropology, soil, geology, and related social and physical sciences, both prior to excavation and thereafter, in order to plan and aid in discovery of sites and artifacts and their proper assessment once discovered;

(4)

Publication of findings in terms of their scientific, popular, and cultural values;

(5)

Display and custodianship of relics, artifacts, sites, and other tangible results of the program; and

(6)

Educational activities providing a stimulus to archeological efforts and the encouragement of archeological societies, parks, and museums.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 2; 1967, No. 39, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-1002, 9-1011; Acts 1991, No. 274, § 1.

Cross References.

Program of historic preservation, performance by Archeological Survey and Historic Preservation Program of the Department of Arkansas Heritage, §13-7-105.

13-6-203. Directory of Survey.

(a)

The President of the University of Arkansas shall appoint a Director of the Arkansas Archeological Survey who shall have a doctor of philosophy degree in anthropology with a specialization in archeology or the equivalent in training and experience who shall be responsible for the overall administration and coordination of the Arkansas Archeological Survey, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the president.

(b)

The director shall perform the duties that may be set by the president and may be paid from funds appropriated for the survey.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1010; Acts 1991, No. 274, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 1568, § 2 provided:

“ARCHEOLOGICAL SURVEY CONTRACT. The Archeological Survey shall contract with the Arkansas Humanities Council to grant funds to local organizations and provide training and assistance in historical research methods and the Arkansas Archeological Survey shall provide assistance in archeological methods, as needed.”

13-6-204. State Archeologist and other survey personnel.

(a)(1)

The President of the University of Arkansas shall appoint a State Archeologist who shall have a doctor of philosophy degree in anthropology with a specialization in archeology, or the equivalent in training and experience, and such other full-time or part-time employees as may be required to carry on the Arkansas Archeological Survey, all of whom shall possess such qualifications as may be prescribed by the president.

(2)

The State Archeologist shall be a full-time employee of the survey.

(b)

The personnel of the survey shall be deemed employees of the University of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, §§ 2, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-1010, 9-1015; Acts 1991, No. 274, § 3.

13-6-205. Appropriations — Disposition of funds.

(a)

Funds appropriated for the Arkansas Archeological Survey shall be by specific appropriation separate and distinct from funds appropriated for the University of Arkansas and shall be used exclusively for the purposes of the survey.

(b)

All expenditures of funds appropriated for the survey shall be made in accordance with and subject to the state purchasing laws, the state travel laws and rules, and other laws and rules applicable thereto.

(c)

The survey is authorized to enter into contracts with and to receive and expend gifts, grants, or other funds from federal, private, or other sources to be used in furtherance of the program of the survey within the limitations of the maximum annual salary rates as set forth by law.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1010; Acts 2003, No. 1638, § 12; 2019, No. 315, § 981.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in (b).

13-6-206. Duties of University of Arkansas.

(a)

The University of Arkansas is to make available for study in connection with the Arkansas Archeological Survey the holdings of its museum which contains the world's best and most extensive collection of Arkansas archeological material and the valuable collection of archeological and related literature held by its library.

(b)

The cooperation of the University of Arkansas’s personnel in other related fields of activity shall be extended to the Arkansas Archeological Survey created by this subchapter.

(c)

However, the University of Arkansas’s responsibility to initiate, operate, and continue to maintain an archeological program exceeding the scope of its present operations in that field shall be and is made dependent upon the fiscal year appropriation of additional state funds for that purpose.

(d)

All funds received from any source for the survey shall be held by, expended by, and disbursed through regular University of Arkansas business channels, but these funds shall be used only in support of the activities described in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1003.

13-6-207. Housing for survey.

The University of Arkansas and cooperating institutions shall provide appropriate housing to the extent that it is available in the nature of laboratory and office space for Arkansas Archeological Survey personnel without cost to the survey.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1015.

13-6-208. Participation in program — Contracts for and assignment of survey archeologists and personnel.

(a)

All public institutions of higher learning in Arkansas desiring to participate in the Arkansas Archeological Survey provided for in this subchapter may contract with the University of Arkansas for Arkansas Archeological Survey archeologists to be assigned to and in residence at the contracting institutions.

(b)

Any institutions desiring to be assigned a survey archeologist-in-residence at the institutions shall agree to provide the university under contract an amount not less than the equivalent of twenty-five percent (25%) of the salary of the archeologist upon a nine-month basis.

(c)

When a contract is entered into by the university and a cooperating institution, the survey archeologist may be assigned to and based at the cooperating institution for the contract period, which shall normally be twelve (12) months unless a shorter period is provided in the contract.

(d)

During the portion of the survey archeologist's time contracted for by a cooperating institution, he or she may perform research, teaching, or other related functions as directed by the cooperating institution in accordance with the terms of the contract, provided these other functions shall not be such as to interfere with the effective performance of his or her duties as a survey archeologist.

(e)

The university shall enter into contracts with cooperating institutions for the assignment of survey personnel to the extent that the assignments are consistent with the purposes and aims of the survey and insofar as funds and personnel permit the contracts to be made or renewed.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1012.

13-6-209. Cooperation of state and local entities.

All other state agencies, departments, and institutions, as well as county and city officials, are directed to cooperate in the activities described in this subchapter in order that a statewide focus shall be given the implementation of the Arkansas Archeological Survey created by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1004.

13-6-210. Salvage work — Cooperative agreements.

(a)

In recognition of the fact that archeological materials and antiquities are destroyed or damaged in connection with the construction of public works such as highways and dams, the Arkansas Archeological Survey created by this subchapter shall include salvage work in advance of or coexistent with public construction and advice directed to the avoidance of waste of archeological sites and materials.

(b)

Authority is granted to the University of Arkansas to cooperate with individuals and state and federal agencies in surveying and excavating archeological sites. Full power to contract with these persons or agencies relative to these matters is extended.

(c)

The State Highway Commission is authorized and directed to enter into appropriate contracts and cooperative agreements with the university and the Federal Highway Administration and to expend funds, both state and federal, in aid of archeological salvage and archeological preservation on all or any part of the lands and rights-of-way now or coming into the commission's control in order that the beneficial purposes of this subchapter shall be achieved.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 9-1006, 9-1007.

Cross References.

State Highway Commission, powers and duties, §27-65-107.

13-6-211. Grants, donations, etc.

(a)

The President of the University of Arkansas System is authorized to accept grants, bequests, devises, gifts, and donations for purposes of a state program in archeological research and to expend them to that end.

(b)

The president's full power to accept and hold title to interests in land for those purposes is recognized.

(c)

The president is empowered to make a reasonable charge for publications and expend the proceeds for the program.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1008.

13-6-212. Repositories for archeological evidence.

(a)

The Arkansas Archeological Survey shall serve as the repository for copies of all archeological field notes, photographs, publications, or other records obtained through the use of state funds by whatever agency.

(b)

All archeological objects found through the efforts of the survey shall be deposited at the University of Arkansas museum, provided, archeological objects obtained by survey archeologists while under contract to and assigned to a cooperating institution, upon request of the cooperating institution, may be assigned to the custody of the institution if appropriate and adequate safeguards are provided.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1013.

13-6-213. Artifacts, fossils, and relics.

(a)

All artifacts, fossils, relics, and other personal property discovered, donated, or otherwise acquired in pursuance of this program shall be the property of the State of Arkansas held in trust by the University of Arkansas.

(b)

The university shall, to the extent possible, make these items available for scientific use or public display by appropriate public bodies at places throughout the state.

(c)

However, complete authority is granted to exchange and barter such items for other items deemed of equal value with persons, nonprofit organizations, and public agencies both within and without Arkansas, in order that representative collections may be assembled and that study and analysis be enhanced.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 82, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1005.

13-6-214. Responsibility for objects obtained — Loans.

(a)

The Arkansas Archeological Survey shall hold title to and have primary responsibility for all archeological objects and materials obtained pursuant to this program or otherwise accruing to the survey.

(b)

It shall be the responsibility of the Director of the Arkansas Archeological Survey to see that all archeological material is properly and adequately safeguarded and available at all reasonable times to interested scientists and to the public, insofar as funds and good scientific practices permit.

(c)

Whenever it is consistent with good scientific practices and in the furtherance of the aims and purposes of the survey as stated in this subchapter, the director may approve of and permit the loan of objects and materials to a state museum in Arkansas, to educational or scientific institutions or organizations, or to other institutions or organizations for purposes of research or public education.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1014.

13-6-215. Programs of Arkansas Archeological Society.

The Arkansas Archeological Survey is authorized to assist and support the programs of the Arkansas Archeological Society to the extent that the purposes and aims of the two (2) coincide.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1016.

13-6-216. Annual review and evaluation.

The Arkansas Archeological Society is requested to annually review and evaluate the programs and activities of the Arkansas Archeological Survey and to provide written reports of the evaluation to the Director of the Arkansas Archeological Survey, each state-supported institution of higher learning, and any other interested institutions and agencies that may request the reports.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 39, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 9-1017.

Subchapter 3

— Sites

Preambles.

Acts 1967, No. 58 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the public has an interest in preservation of all antiquities, historic ruins, sites, artifacts, and similar places and things for their scientific and historical information and value; and

“Whereas, the public has a right to the knowledge to be derived and gained from a scientific study of these materials; and

“Whereas, the most recent past has seen the neglect, desecration and destruction of sites and the removal without adequate records of archeological objects and artifacts with a resulting loss to our people of knowledge concerning their heritage; and

“Whereas, prehistoric and historic remains, sites, and objects of antiquity are rightfully and properly the subject of coordinated and organized activities exercised on behalf of the general welfare of the public as a whole in order that they may be preserved, studied, exhibited, and evaluated;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 10: Feb. 9, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that valuable archeological materials, sites, mounds and relics are being lost through thoughtless destruction, neglect and desecration; that early preventive action is required in order that the heritage of an earlier age not be lost; that it is necessary to take immediate steps for the preservation, protection, excavation and evaluation of these artifacts and archeological sites so as to increase the available knowledge of prior cultures in Arkansas; and that only by the immediate passage of this act can these purposes be accomplished. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

13-6-301. Reservation of rights — Legislative intent.

(a)(1)

The State of Arkansas reserves to itself the exclusive right and privilege of field archeology on sites owned or controlled by the state, its agencies, departments, and institutions, in order to protect and preserve archeological and scientific information, matter, and objects.

(2)

All information and objects deriving from state lands shall be utilized solely for scientific or public educational purposes and shall remain the property of the state.

(b)(1)

It is a declaration and statement of legislative intent that field archeology on privately owned lands should be discouraged except in accordance with both the provisions and spirit of this subchapter.

(2)

Persons having knowledge of the location of archeological sites are encouraged to communicate the information to the Arkansas Archeological Survey.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-802.

13-6-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)(A)(i)

“Archeological site” means a location containing the physical remains of human life or human activities that are no less than one hundred (100) years old.

(ii)

An archeological site may but need not contain pottery, basketry, bottles, weapons, weapon projectiles, tools, structures or portions of structures, rock paintings, graves, and human skeletal remains.

(B)

“Archeological site” includes all aboriginal mounds, forts, earthworks, village locations, burial grounds, historic or prehistoric ruins, mines, or caves that are or may be the source of a significant amount of artifacts;

(2)

“Artifact” means a relic, specimen, or object of an historical, prehistorical, archeological, or anthropological nature that:

(A)

May be found above or below the surface of the earth; and

(B)

Has scientific or historic value as an object of antiquity, as an aboriginal relic, or as an archeological specimen; and

(3)

“Field archeology” means the study of the traces of human culture at any land or water site by means of surveying, digging, sampling, excavating, or removing subsurface objects or going on an archeological site with that intent.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-801; Acts 2007, No. 217, § 1.

13-6-303. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning penalties, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 217, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1967, No. 58, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-808.

13-6-304. Cooperation by state and local entities.

(a)

All state agencies, departments, institutions, and commissions, as well as all counties and municipalities, shall cooperate fully with the Arkansas Archeological Survey in the preservation, protection, excavation, and evaluation of artifacts and sites.

(b)

To that end, where any site or artifacts may be found or discovered on property owned or controlled by the state or by any county or municipality, the agency, bureau, commission, governmental subdivision, or county or municipality, having control over or owning the property or preparing to excavate or perform work upon the property or currently performing work of any type upon the property is urged to notify the survey of the discovery and location of the site or artifacts.

(c)

Any state or local entity shall cooperate to the fullest extent practicable with the survey to preserve and prevent the destruction of the site or artifacts and to allow the survey to assist in, and effect, the removal of artifacts by means designed to preserve and permit the study and evaluation of the artifacts.

(d)

The provisions of this subchapter shall be made known to contractors by the state agencies doing the contracting.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-803.

13-6-305. Reservation of state lands from sale.

(a)(1)

Upon written notice to the Commissioner of State Lands given by the Arkansas Archeological Survey, the Commissioner of State Lands shall reserve from sale any state lands, including lands forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes, on which sites or artifacts are located or may be found, as designated by the survey.

(2)

However, the reservation of lands from sale may be confined to the actual location of the site or artifacts.

(b)

When sites or artifacts have been explored, excavated, or otherwise examined to the extent desired by the survey, the survey shall then file with the Commissioner of State Lands a statement releasing the lands and permitting the sale of the lands.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-805.

13-6-306. State archeological landmarks — Penalty for disturbing.

(a)(1)

An archeological site of significance to the scientific study or public representation of Arkansas's aboriginal past may be publicly designated by the Arkansas Archeological Survey as a state archeological landmark.

(2)

However, no sites shall be so designated without the express written consent of the state agency having jurisdiction over the land in question or, if it is on privately owned land, of the owner thereof.

(b)

When an archeological site has been designated as a state archeological landmark, excavation for the purpose of recovery or the recovery of one (1) or more artifacts from the state archeological landmark by a person other than the survey or its designated agent is a:

(1)

Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for a subsequent offense if the value of the artifacts excavated or recovered or the cost to restore or repair the damage to the archeological site is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or

(2)

Class B misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class A misdemeanor for a subsequent offense if the value of the artifacts excavated or recovered or the cost to restore or repair the damage to the archeological site is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less.

(c)

Once so designated, excavation for the purpose of recovery or the recovery of artifacts from such sites by persons other than the survey or its duly designated agents shall be a misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-804; Acts 2007, No. 217, § 3.

13-6-307. Digging up or removing artifact without permission — Penalty.

(a)(1)

It is unlawful for any person, natural or corporate, to knowingly dig up an artifact from the private land of the owner without first obtaining the owner's permission.

(2)

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) of this section is a:

(A)

Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for a subsequent offense if the value of all artifacts dug up or the cost to restore or repair the owner's property is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or

(B)

Class B misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class A misdemeanor for a subsequent offense if the value of all artifacts dug up or the cost to restore or repair the owner's property is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less.

(b)(1)

It is unlawful for any person, natural or corporate, to knowingly remove an artifact from the private land of the owner without first obtaining the owner's permission.

(2)

A violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section is a Class C misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class B misdemeanor for a subsequent offense.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-806; Acts 2007, No. 217, § 4.

13-6-308. Vandalism of archeological sites and artifacts — Penalty.

(a)

In order that archeological sites and artifacts on state-owned or state-controlled land shall be protected for the benefit of the public, no person, natural or corporate, shall knowingly dig up and remove, write upon, carve upon, paint, deface, mutilate, destroy, or otherwise injure any artifact or archeological site.

(b)

A violation of this section is a:

(1)

Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for a subsequent offense if the value of all artifacts dug up and removed or the cost to repair or restore the damage to the archeological site is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or

(2)

Class B misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class A misdemeanor for a subsequent offense if the value of all artifacts dug up and removed or the cost to repair or restore the damage to the archeological site is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 58, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-807; Acts 2007, No. 217, § 5.

Subchapter 4

— Human Skeletal Burial Remains

Preambles.

Acts 1991, No. 753 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the state and its citizens have an obligation to protect from desecration all human skeletal burial remains and associated burial furniture including those from unmarked, unrecorded, abandoned, or unregistered graves, burial grounds, or cemeteries; and

“Whereas, the skeletal burial remains and associated burial furniture of many Native Americans, Europeans, Blacks, American settlers, and others were placed in burial grounds not presently known, recorded, or registered;

“Now therefore….”

13-6-401. Legislative intent.

(a)

It is a declaration and statement of the General Assembly's intent that all human burials and human skeletal burial remains shall be accorded equal treatment and respect for human dignity without reference to their ethnic origins, cultural backgrounds, religious affiliations, or date of burial.

(b)

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to all human burials or human skeletal burial remains found on or in all public or private lands or waters of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 3.

13-6-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Artifacts” means arrowheads, other bone and stone tools, pottery, pottery fragments, china, metal objects or other material objects made by Native American settlers, or other residents of Arkansas, which were left or lost in or on the ground, except those items which were placed in direct association with human skeletal burial remains or burial furniture as defined in this subchapter;

(2)

“Burial furniture” means any items which were placed with human remains at the time of burial or in apparent intentional association with the burial and would include burial markers, items of personal adornment, casket and casket hardware, stone and bone tools, pottery vessels, or other similar objects or materials;

(3)

“Burial grounds” means any place where human skeletal remains are or have been buried;

(4)

“Desecration” means the intentional, willful, or knowing removal or disturbance of human skeletal burial remains or burial furniture which was placed with a buried human body, or treating such human skeletal burial remains in an irreverent and contemptuous manner; and

(5)

“Human skeletal burial remains” means the calcified portion of a human body which remains after the flesh has decomposed.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 1.

13-6-403. State plan for the conservation of archeological resources in Arkansas.

(a)

The public has a right to the knowledge to be derived and gained from the scientific study of human skeletal burial remains and burial furniture.

(b)

Therefore, when justified by “A State Plan for the Conservation of Archeological Resources in Arkansas” as promulgated by the State Archeologist and the State Historic Preservation Officer, the investigation, excavation, removal, and analysis of human skeletal burial remains and burial furniture is authorized and, if done, must be carried out with the consent of the landowner and consulation with the appropriate tribe, if identifiable, and under the direction of archeologists employed by the state or the United States Government or by archeologists meeting the United States Department of the Interior's professional qualifications standards found in the current Code of Federal Regulations.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 7.

13-6-404. Conveyance of exhumed remains.

(a)(1)

If human skeletal burial remains are exhumed for relocation, then at the request of a direct descendant, that of a specific church, or that of a Native American tribal group recognized by the United States Government who can provide written or scientific documentation of such descent, or of direct church or tribal affiliation with the human skeletal burial remains, the human skeletal burial remains will be conveyed to such an individual or entity.

(2)

If human skeletal remains are conveyed to an individual or entity under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, burial furniture exhumed with the human skeletal remains shall be conveyed to the individual or entity.

(b)

By consultation with the groups mentioned in subsection (a) of this section, scientific studies may be undertaken.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 8; 2011, No. 705, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1991, No. 753, § 8, subsection (a) began:

“If, subsequent to the date of this act,”. Acts 1991, No. 753, § 8, was signed by the Governor on March 26, 1991, and became effective on July 15, 1991.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (a)(2).

13-6-405. Unclaimed remains.

(a)

If human skeletal burial remains are not claimed as set forth in §13-6-404, the Arkansas Archeological Survey or a state-supported museum, or a museum accredited by the American Alliance of Museums, may serve as a depository for such skeletal remains as are required for scientific purposes.

(b)

If not otherwise claimed as provided in this subchapter, skeletal burial remains and burial furniture shall be disposed of in accordance with existing laws and rules for disposing of human remains.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 9; 2011, No. 705, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “and burial furniture” in (b).

13-6-406. Trade or collection of remains.

(a)

Anyone who knowingly buys, sells, or barters human skeletal burial remains or their associated burial furniture is committing a Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony on the second and subsequent offenses.

(b)

Artifacts as defined in this subchapter and private collections legally acquired prior to July 15, 1991, are exempted from this section.

(c)

Nothing in this subchapter prohibits the collecting of such artifacts by landowners or others who do so with the landowner's permission.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 4; 1999, No. 1533, § 1.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment, in (a), substituted “Class D felony” for “Class A misdemeanor” and “Class C felony” for “Class D felony.”

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

13-6-407. Display of remains.

Anyone who knowingly displays human skeletal burial remains for profit or to aid and abet a commercial enterprise is committing a Class C felony with each day of display being a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 5; 1999, No. 1533, § 2.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment substituted “Class C felony” for “Class B misdemeanor.”

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

13-6-408. Desecration of burial grounds and burial furniture.

(a)

Anyone who intentionally or knowingly desecrates or permits desecration of a burial ground and associated burial furniture is committing on the first offense a Class D felony and on the second or subsequent offenses a Class C felony.

(b)

The presence in the ground of grave markers, caskets, or casket hardware creates a rebuttable presumption that these are burial furniture and of the existence or presence of a human burial ground.

(c)

Exempted from this section is disturbance of human skeletal burial remains or burial furniture by landowners or agricultural tenants as a consequence of agricultural activity or any other activity unless the landowner or agricultural tenant knowingly desecrates or knowingly allows desecration of a cemetery or burial site.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 6; 1999, No. 1533, § 3; 2005, No. 2232, § 5.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment, in (a), substituted “Class D felony” for “Class A misdemeanor” and “Class C felony” for “Class D felony.”

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

13-6-409. Proof of violations.

The mere possession of items defined in §13-6-402 does not create a presumption of a violation of this subchapter, but the duty shall remain upon the state to prove any violation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 753, § 2.